Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Article 3. Commissioner of Highways.

§ 33.2-222.
Commissioner of Highways.

The Commissioner of Highways shall be the chief executive officer of the Department of Transportation. The Commissioner of Highways shall be an experienced administrator able to direct and guide the Department in the establishment and achievement of the Department’s core mission as provided in subsection B of §

33.2-256

and other transportation objectives determined by the Commonwealth Transportation Board.

The Commissioner of Highways shall devote his entire time and attention to his duties as chief executive officer of the Department and shall receive such compensation as shall be fixed by law. He shall also be reimbursed for his actual travel expenses while engaged in the discharge of his duties.

In the event of a vacancy due to the death, temporary disability, retirement, resignation, or removal of the Commissioner of Highways, the Governor may appoint and thereafter remove at his pleasure an “Acting Commissioner of Highways” until such time as the vacancy may be filled as provided in §

33.2-200

. Such “Acting Commissioner of Highways” shall have all powers and perform all duties of the Commissioner of Highways as provided by law and shall receive such compensation as may be fixed by the Governor. In the event of the temporary disability for any reason of the Commissioner of Highways, full effect shall be given to the provisions of §

2.2-605

.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-3; 1960, c. 271; 1963, Ex. Sess., c. 3; 1964, c. 265; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-3; 1974, c. 462; 1990, cc. 1, 317; 1995, cc. 195, 223; 2007, c. 896; 2014, c. 805; 2017, cc. 166, 273.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 130 provides: “§ 1. The Commissioner of Highways or his designee shall convene a working group with relevant stakeholders, including the Virginia Association of Counties and the Virginia Municipal League, to determine whether there should be model policies for crosswalk design and installation in the Commonwealth and, if so, establish recommendations for such model policies. Any such policies shall promote statewide uniformity, maximize pedestrian safety, and consider the needs of people with disabilities that impair sight or mobility. The working group shall monitor and provide input to the U.S. Department of Transportation and the Federal Highway Administration as updates to crosswalk designs in the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices for Streets and Highways are considered. The working group shall submit to the Governor and the General Assembly a report on its findings and recommendations by November 1, 2021.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 166 and 273 are identical, and substituted “Department’s core mission as provided in subsection B of §

33.2-256

and other transportation objectives determined by the Commonwealth Transportation Board” for “Commonwealth’s long-range highway and other transportation objectives” in the first paragraph.

§ 33.2-223.
General powers of Commissioner of Highways.

Except such powers as are conferred by law upon the Board and the Office of Intermodal Planning and Investment of the Secretary of Transportation, the Commissioner of Highways shall have the power to do all acts necessary or convenient for constructing, improving, maintaining, and preserving the efficient operation of the highways embraced in the systems of state highways and to further the interests of the Commonwealth in the areas of public transportation, railways, seaports, and airports. And as executive head of the Department, the Commissioner of Highways is specifically charged with the duty of executing all orders and decisions of the Board and may, subject to the provisions of this chapter, require that all appointees and employees perform their duties under this chapter.

In addition, the Commissioner of Highways, in order to maximize efficiency, shall take such steps as may be appropriate to outsource or privatize any of the Department’s functions that might reasonably be provided by the private sector. Procuring equipment and labor to ensure that adequate resources will be available to address emergency and weather-related events as they may arise, including snow and ice removal services, shall be considered an emergency under subsection F of §

2.2-4303

, and the Commissioner of Highways shall have the authority to establish and utilize such procedures as he deems necessary and most efficient to obtain and ensure the availability of such services to protect the safety and security of the traveling public.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-13; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-13; 1974, c. 462; 1978, c. 652; 1986, Sp. Sess., c. 13; 2007, cc. 863, 896, 928; 2014, c. 805; 2016, c. 538; 2018, c. 828.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 538 added the last sentence in the section.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 828 inserted “and the Office of Intermodal Planning and Investment of the Secretary of Transportation” in the first paragraph.

§ 33.2-224.
Employees; delegation of responsibilities.

The Commissioner of Highways shall employ such engineers, clerks, assistants, and other employees as may be needed and shall prescribe and fix their duties, including the delegation of duties and responsibilities conferred or imposed upon the Commissioner of Highways by law. They shall receive all salaries and expenses as may be fixed in accordance with the provisions of law.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-7; 1952, c. 41; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-8; 1974, c. 462; 1982, c. 177; 1983, c. 127; 1995, cc. 195, 223; 2001, cc. 69, 87; 2011, cc. 36, 152; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-225.
Liaison duties with other organizations.

Tasks and responsibilities concerning transportation program or project delivery shall be carried out as follows:

The Commissioner of Highways shall cooperate with the federal government, the American Association of State Highway and Transportation Officials, and any other organization in the numbering, signing, and marking of highways; in the taking of measures for the promotion of highway safety; in research activities; in the preparation of standard specifications; in the testing of highway materials; and otherwise with respect to transportation projects.

The Department of Transportation and the Department of Rail and Public Transportation may offer technical assistance and coordinate state resources, as available, to work with local governments, upon their request, in developing sound transportation components for their local comprehensive plans.

History.

2013, cc. 585, 646, § 33.1-190.4; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-226.
Authority to lease or convey airspace.

The Commissioner of Highways may lease or sell and convey the airspace superjacent or subjacent to any highway in the Commonwealth that is within his jurisdiction and in which the Commonwealth owns fee simple title after satisfying itself that use of the airspace will not impair the full use and safety of the highway or otherwise interfere with the free flow of traffic thereon and it cannot be reasonably foreseen as needed in the future for highway and other transit uses and purposes. The Commissioner of Highways may provide in such leases and conveyances of airspace for columns of support, in fee or otherwise, ingress, egress, and utilities.

No lease or conveyance shall be entered into by the Commissioner of Highways unless the locality, by action of its governing body by majority recorded vote, approves the projected use of the airspace in question and has taken such steps as it deems proper to regulate the type and use of the improvements to be erected in such airspace by appropriate zoning or other method of land use control.

All leases and conveyances shall contain those terms deemed necessary by the Commissioner of Highways to protect the interests of the Commonwealth and the public. The Commissioner of Highways may utilize any competitive procurement process authorized by law, including (i) competitive sealed bidding, (ii) competitive negotiation, (iii) best value procurements as defined in §

2.2-4301

, and (iv) public-private partnerships pursuant to the Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995 (§

33.2-1800

et seq.), as determined by the Commissioner of Highways, in his sole discretion, to be appropriate and the method most likely to achieve the identified goals of the proposed lease or sale and conveyance of airspace. The Commissioner of Highways may reject any bid or offer that he believes is not in the best interest of the Commonwealth.

Compensation paid for such leases and conveyances shall be credited to the Priority Transportation Fund established pursuant to §

33.2-1527

.

History.

1979, c. 431, § 33.1-183.1; 2013, cc. 585, 646; 2014, c. 805; 2017, c. 278; 2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 278, in the second paragraph, substituted “unless” for “until after the time” and “of the airspace in question and has” for “and has zoned the airspace in question or has otherwise,” and inserted “by appropriate zoning or other method of land use control”; and rewrote the third paragraph, which formerly read “All leases and conveyances shall contain those terms deemed necessary by the Commissioner of Highways to protect the interests of the Commonwealth and the public and shall not be entered into until after public advertising for bids for such airspace. The Commissioner of Highways shall advertise for bids at least 14 days prior to the execution of a lease or a conveyance. The advertisement shall state the place where bidders may examine a map of the airspace, the general terms of the lease or conveyance and the time and place when bids will be opened by the Commissioner of Highways. The highest bid from a responsible bidder, in the sole discretion of the Commissioner of Highways, shall be accepted; however, the Commissioner of Highways may reject all bids and advertise the property again.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1230 and 1275 are identical, and substituted “Priority Transportation Fund established pursuant to §

33.2-1527

” for “Transportation Trust Fund established pursuant to §

33.2-1524

” in the fourth paragraph.

§ 33.2-227.
Defense of employees.

If any person employed by the Commonwealth Transportation Board, the Department of Transportation, or the Department of Rail and Public Transportation is arrested or indicted or otherwise prosecuted on any charge arising out of any act committed in the discharge of his official duties, the Commissioner of Highways or the Director of the Department of Rail and Public Transportation may employ special counsel approved by the Attorney General to defend such employee. The compensation for special counsel employed, pursuant to this section, shall, subject to the approval of the Attorney General, be paid by the agency for which the employee works out of the funds appropriated for the administration of the Department of Transportation or the Department of Rail and Public Transportation.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-11.1; 1958, c. 542; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-11; 1974, c. 462; 2013, cc. 585, 646; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-228.
Agreements between Commissioner of Highways and certain localities.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §§

33.2-209

,

33.2-214

, and

33.2-221

, the Commissioner of Highways, pursuant to a resolution adopted by the Board and following receipt of a resolution adopted by the governing body of a locality, may enter into an agreement with any such locality pursuant to which the locality assumes responsibility for the design, right-of-way acquisition, and construction of highways or portions thereof in such locality, using funds allocated pursuant to §

33.2-371

.

History.

2004, c. 623, § 33.1-12.1; 2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 684.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 684 substituted “locality” for “city or town” throughout the section; deleted “33.2-362” preceding “the Commissioner”; deleted “to which funds are apportioned pursuant to § 33.2-362” following “body of a”; deleted “urban system” preceding “highways or portions thereof”; substituted “§

33.2-371

” for “subdivision C of §

33.2-358

”; and made a related change.

§ 33.2-229.
Furnishing information regarding right-of-way transactions.

Upon written request to the central office of the Department, the Commissioner of Highways shall furnish information regarding right-of-way transactions where any public funds are expended. Such information shall not be released prior to 60 days following the transaction to any person not a party directly interested in such transaction.

The information furnished under this section shall consist of (i) the name of the person to whom any sum was paid for land or interest therein, (ii) the amount of land or interest therein acquired from such person, and (iii) the amount paid such person for land and the amount paid for damage resulting to the remaining property of such person.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-15.1; 1958, c. 316; 1960, c. 352; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-16; 1974, c. 462; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-230.
Written notice of decision to dispose of real property.

Whenever the Board or the Department decides to sell or otherwise dispose of any surplus real property, the Commissioner of Highways shall provide written notice of such decision to the mayor or chairman of the governing body of the locality in which the property or any portion thereof is located. Any failure to provide or receive such notice shall not create a cloud on the title to the property.

History.

1999, c. 287, § 33.1-223.2:2; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-231.
Establish community service landscaping program.

The Commissioner of Highways shall establish a program whereby persons convicted of nonviolent misdemeanors who have received a suspended sentence or probation can fulfill their community service requirements by mowing rights-of-way and performing other landscaping maintenance tasks for roads and highways that the Department has the responsibility to maintain.

History.

2008, c. 688, § 33.1-12.2; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-232.
Biennial reports by Commissioner of Highways and the Office of Intermodal Planning and Investment.

The Secretary of Transportation shall ensure that the reports required under subsections B and C are provided in writing to the Governor, the General Assembly, and the Commonwealth Transportation Board by the dates specified.

The Commissioner of Highways shall provide to each recipient specified in subsection A, no later than November 1 of each even-numbered year, a report, the content of which shall be specified by the Board and shall contain, at a minimum:

The methodology used to determine maintenance needs, including an explanation of the transparent methodology used for the allocation of funds from the Highway Maintenance and Operating Fund pursuant to subsection A of §

33.2-352

;

The methodology approved by the Board for the allocation of funds for state of good repair purposes as defined in §

33.2-369

and, if necessary, an explanation and rationale for any waiver of the cap provided for in subsection B of §

33.2-369

;

The expenditures from the Highway Maintenance and Operating Program for the past fiscal year by asset class or activity and by construction district as well as the planned expenditure for the current fiscal year;

A description of transportation systems management and operations in the Commonwealth and the operating condition of primary and secondary state highways, including location and average duration of incidents;

A listing of prioritized pavement and bridge needs based on the priority ranking system developed by the Board pursuant to §

33.2-369

and a description of the priority ranking system;

A description of actions taken to improve highway operations within the Commonwealth, including the use of funds in the Innovation and Technology Transportation Fund established pursuant to §

33.2-1531

;

The use of funds in the Special Structure Fund established pursuant to §

33.2-1532

;

The status of the Interstate Operations and Enhancement Program, including, at a minimum, the allocation of revenues for the program, the current and projected performance of each interstate highway corridor, and the anticipated benefits of funded strategies, capital improvements, and services by the interstate highway; and

A review of the Department’s collaboration with the private sector in delivering services.

The Office of Intermodal Planning and Investment of the Secretary of Transportation shall provide to each recipient specified in subsection A, no later than November 1 of each odd-numbered year, a report, the content of which shall be specified by the Board and shall contain, at a minimum:

A list of transportation projects approved or modified during the prior fiscal year, including whether each such project was evaluated pursuant to §

33.2-214.1

and the program from which each such project received funding;

The results of the most recent project evaluations pursuant to §

33.2-214.1

, including a comparison of (i) projects selected for funding with projects not selected for funding, (ii) funding allocated by district and by mode of transportation, and (iii) the size of projects selected for funding;

The current performance of the Commonwealth’s surface transportation system, the targets for future performance, and the progress toward such targets based on the measures developed pursuant to §

2.2-229

;

The status of the Virginia Transportation Infrastructure Bank, including the balance in the Bank, funding commitments made over the prior fiscal year, and performance of the current loan portfolio;

The status of the Toll Facilities Revolving Account, including the balance in the account, project commitments from the account, repayment schedules, and the performance of the current loan portfolio; and

Progress made toward achieving the performance targets established by the Commonwealth Transportation Board.

The purpose of the reports required pursuant to this section is to ensure transparency and accountability in the use of transportation funds. Reports required by this section shall be made available to the public on the website of the Commonwealth Transportation Board.

History.

2011, cc. 36, 152, § 33.1-13.03; 2014, cc. 290, 805; 2015, c. 684; 2016, c. 711; 2017, c. 537; 2018, c. 828; 2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2014, c. 290 amended
§ 33.1-13.03, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to
§ 30-152, the
2014 amendment by c. 290 has been given effect in this section by inserting clause (iv) and redesignating former clause (iv) as clause (v).

Acts
2019, cc. 401 and
568, cl. 1 expires January 1, 2021, and provides: “§ 1. The Commissioner of Highways shall report annually by December 1 to the Governor, the General Assembly, and the Commonwealth Transportation Board regarding the operation of overweight vehicles on highways of the Commonwealth. The report shall include, at a minimum, (i) data regarding the frequency and severity of incidents and crashes involving overweight trucks compared to other trucks, (ii) the maintenance and infrastructure needs of routes frequently used by overweight trucks and comparison of such needs to similar routes not frequented by such trucks, and (iii) the estimated number of additional vehicle miles that would be necessary if such vehicles were not permitted to carry overweight loads. In submitting the report, the Commissioner shall indicate if additional data is needed to provide further reports, and if so, include a proposal for additional data collection. Nothing herein shall be construed to require the Commissioner to prospectively gather additional data not already collected by the Commissioner or any transportation agency.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 684 rewrote the section.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 711 inserted the present second sentence in the introductory paragraph; and added subdivision 8 and made related changes.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 537 deleted “Beginning with the November 2015 report through the November 2019 report” at the beginning of subdivision 3; deleted “Beginning with the November 2016 report” at the beginning of subdivision 5; added subdivisions 9 and 10; and made related changes.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 828 rewrote the section.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1230 and 1275 are identical, and deleted “and” preceding “§

33.2-1531

” in subdivision B 6; added subdivisions B 7 and B 8; and renumbered former subdivision B 8 as subdivision B 9.

§ 33.2-233.
Gathering and reporting of information and statistics.

The Commissioner of Highways and the Director of the Department of Rail and Public Transportation shall gather and tabulate information and statistics relating to transportation and disseminate the same throughout the Commonwealth. In addition, the Commissioner of Highways shall provide a report to the Governor, the General Assembly, the Board, and the public concerning the current status of all highway construction projects in the Commonwealth. This report shall be posted at least four times each fiscal year but may be updated more often as circumstances allow. The report shall contain, at a minimum, the following information for every project in the Six-Year Improvement Program: (i) project description; (ii) total cost estimate; (iii) funds expended to date; (iv) project timeline and completion date; (v) statement of whether project is ahead of, on, or behind schedule; (vi) the name of the prime contractor; (vii) total expenditures of federal transportation funds in each county and city; (viii) total expenditures of state transportation funds in each county and city; (ix) statewide totals for federal, state, and local funds expended for highways; (x) statewide totals for federal, state, and local funds expended for transit; (xi) total funds expended on intercity passenger and freight rail line and trains; and (xii) total funds expended in each federal and state programmatic category. Use of one or more websites may be used to satisfy this requirement. Project-specific information posted on the Internet shall be updated daily as information is available.

The Department shall develop performance metrics that measure the efficiency and quality of the Department’s processes for the review of and approval of subdivision and commercial development plans. The Commissioner of Highways shall gather and tabulate information to support development of the performance metrics. The data collected and reported shall include, at a minimum, (i) the length of time that it takes the Department to review plans from the date the plans are received in the local office of the Department until comments are returned to the local government; (ii) the number of reviews that are required to achieve final approval of plans; and (iii) measures reported at the residency, district, and statewide levels of the Department.

The Department shall adopt performance standards for the review and approval of subdivision and commercial development plans no later than January 1, 2025. Once performance standards are developed, these measures will be reported and made available for public view on the Department’s website and shall be updated on a quarterly basis.

History.

2013, cc. 585, 646, § 33.1-13.05; 2014, c. 805; 2022, c. 680.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 680, added the subsection A designation; added subsection B.

§ 33.2-234.
Construction by state or local employees.

Irrespective of the provisions of §

33.2-235

, in cases of emergency or on any project reasonably estimated to cost not more than $700,000, the Commissioner of Highways may build or maintain any of the highways in the systems of state highways by state employees or local employees as he may designate.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, the Commissioner of Highways may enter into a written agreement with a locality for the building and maintenance of any of the highways in the systems of state highways by local employees provided that (i) the locality has obtained a cost estimate for the work of not more than $1 million and (ii) the locality has issued an invitation for bid and has received fewer than two bids from private entities to build or maintain such highways.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-104; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-190; 1977, c. 678; 1982, c. 647; 1985, c. 130; 1986, Sp. Sess., c. 9; 2006, cc. 434, 480; 2008, c. 472; 2010, cc. 22, 50; 2014, c. 805; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 260.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 260, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “$700,000” for “$600,000” in subsection A.

§ 33.2-235.
Procurement.

All projects reasonably estimated to cost $300,000 or more that the Board or the Commissioner of Highways may undertake for construction shall be let in accordance with the Virginia Public Procurement Act (§

2.2-4300

et seq.). When such projects are reasonably estimated to cost below $300,000, the Commissioner of Highways may let them to contract, and if such projects are let to contract, they shall be let only in accordance with the Virginia Public Procurement Act.

As used in this section, “project” means construction and does not include routine maintenance work or the installation of traffic control devices, unless such work is to be performed under contract.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-99; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-185; 1973, c. 229; 1977, c. 678; 1978, c. 144; 1982, c. 647; 1992, c. 108; 2010, cc. 22, 50; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-236.
Maps or plats prepared at request and expense of local governing bodies and other groups; Department of Energy to seek other existing sources.

The Commissioner of Highways may prepare photogrammetric maps or plats of specific sites or areas at the request of the governing bodies of localities of the Commonwealth, local nonprofit industrial development agencies, planning district commissions, soil and water conservation districts, metropolitan planning organizations, public service authorities, and local chambers of commerce. The Department of Energy shall first review the request to determine whether suitable or alternate maps or plats are currently available, and the local governing body, agency, or chamber shall agree to reimburse the Department of Transportation for the cost of producing the maps or plats.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-136.2; 1962, c. 96; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-222; 1982, c. 184; 1984, c. 590; 2014, c. 805; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, effective October 1, 2021, substituted “Department of Energy” for “Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy.”

§ 33.2-237.
Directional signs for certain educational institutions.

For the purpose of this section, “Virginia educational institution” means a for-profit educational institution with its main campus located in the Commonwealth that (i) has, for at least five consecutive years prior to making a request under this section, awarded academic degrees approved by the State Council of Higher Education for Virginia; (ii) offers programs in workforce training or job readiness that contribute to Virginia’s economic growth and development; and (iii) has a combined annual enrollment of at least 1,000 students at its main campus and any branch location situated within a radius of 25 miles from the main campus.

Upon request from a Virginia educational institution, the Commissioner of Highways shall erect and maintain signs at appropriate and conspicuous locations along interstate, primary, or secondary highways providing motorists directions to the main or branch location of any such institution. All costs associated with production and erection of signs under this section shall be borne by the affected institution, but all costs associated with maintenance of those signs shall be borne by the Department.

Signs erected by the Department under this section shall be placed in accordance with all applicable Department regulations.

History.

1999, c. 310, § 33.1-223.2:3; 2014, c. 805.

Editor’s note.

Former § 33.1-223.2:3, from which this section was derived, was enacted as
§ 33.1-223.2:2 by Acts
1999, c. 310, and subsequently renumbered at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 33.2-238.
Closing highways for safety of public or proper completion of construction; injury to barriers, signs, etc.

If it appears to the Commissioner of Highways necessary for the safety of the traveling public or for proper completion of work that is being performed to close any highway under his jurisdiction to all traffic or any class of traffic, the Commissioner of Highways may close, or cause to be closed, the whole or any portion of such highway deemed necessary to be excluded from public travel and may exclude all or any class of traffic from such closed portion. While any such highway or portion thereof is so closed, or while any such highway or portion thereof is in process of construction or maintenance, the Commissioner of Highways, or contractor under authority from the Commissioner of Highways, may erect, or cause to be erected, suitable barriers or obstructions thereon, may post, or cause to be posted, conspicuous notices to the effect that the highway or portion thereof is closed and may place warning signs, lights, and lanterns on such highway or portion thereof. When such highway is closed for the safety of the traveling public or in process of construction or maintenance as provided in this section, any person who willfully breaks down, drives into new construction work, removes, injures, or destroys any such barrier or barriers or obstructions, tears down, removes, or destroys any such notices, or extinguishes, removes, injures, or destroys any such warning lights or lanterns so erected, posted, or placed is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-109; 1958, c. 547; 1968, c. 162; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-193; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-239.
Providing highway detours.

Whenever necessary, the Commissioner of Highways shall select, lay out, maintain, and keep in as good repair as possible suitable detours, by the most practical route, while the highways are being improved or constructed, and he shall place or cause to be placed explicit directions to the traveling public during repair of any such highway under process of construction.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-110; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-194; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-240.
Connections over shoulders of highways for intersecting private roads.

The Commissioner of Highways shall permit suitable connections from where private roads leading to and from private homes intersect improved highways and over and across the shoulders and unimproved parts of such highways to the paved or otherwise improved parts thereof to provide the users of such private roads safe and convenient means of ingress and egress with motor vehicles to and from the paved or otherwise improved parts of such highways.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-116; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-197; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-241.
Connections over shoulders of highways for intersecting commercial establishment entrances; penalty.

The Commissioner of Highways shall permit suitable connections from where commercial establishment entrances are desired to intersect improved highways and over and across the shoulders and unimproved parts of such highways to the paved or otherwise improved parts thereof that comply with the access management standards of the Commissioner of Highways for the location, spacing, and design of entrances, taking into account the operating characteristics and federal functional classification of the highway, to provide the users of such entrances safe and convenient means of ingress and egress with motor vehicles to and from the paved or otherwise improved parts of such highways while minimizing the impact of such ingress and egress on the operation of such highways, provided that any person desiring such an entrance shall:

Be required first to obtain a permit therefor from the Commissioner of Highways;

Provide the entrance at his expense;

If required by the Commissioner of Highways, provide for the joint use of the desired entrance with adjacent property owners or provide evidence of such efforts; and

Construct the entrance or have the entrance constructed, including such safety structures as are required by the Commissioner of Highways, pursuant to the Department of Transportation’s design standards and applicable Department regulations concerning access management and applicable Board regulations concerning land use permits.All commercial entrances whether or not constructed under this section shall be maintained by the owner of the premises at all times in a manner satisfactory to the Commissioner of Highways.Any person violating the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than $5 nor more than $100 for each offense. Following a conviction and 15 days for correction, each day during which the violation continues shall constitute a separate and distinct offense and be punishable as such. Such person shall be civilly liable to the Commonwealth for actual damage sustained by the Commonwealth by reason of his wrongful act.The Commissioner of Highways shall document and maintain a list of anyone who has requested an onsite meeting with the resident engineer or his staff. Such list shall also include recommendations made pursuant to the Department of Transportation’s design standards and applicable Department regulations concerning access management and applicable Board regulations concerning land use permits and any associated cost estimates. Such list shall be provided to a locality upon the request of such locality.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-116.1; 1956, c. 91; 1966, c. 378; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-198; 2005, c. 645; 2007, cc. 863, 928; 2014, c. 805; 2017, c. 542.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 542 added the last paragraph.

§ 33.2-242.
Replacing entrances destroyed in the repair or construction of highways.

The Commissioner of Highways shall review the existing access to any parcel of land having an entrance destroyed in the repair or construction of the systems of state highways and shall provide access to the systems of state highways in a manner that will serve the parcel of land and ensure efficient and safe highway operation.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-117; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-199; 2007, cc. 863, 928; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-243.
Paying for damages sustained to personal property by reason of work projects, etc.

The Commissioner of Highways may pay and settle claims and demands against the Commonwealth arising as a result of damages sustained to personal property by reason of work projects or the operation of state-owned or operated equipment when engaged in the construction, reconstruction, or maintenance of the primary state highway system, unless said claims or demands arise as a result of negligence of the person asserting such claims or demands. Nothing in this section shall be construed as imposing any legal liability upon the Commonwealth to pay such claims or demands, nor as giving the consent of the Commonwealth to be sued in any action or suit to recover on such claims or demands in the event the Commissioner of Highways refuses payment of said claims or demands.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-117.1; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-200; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-244.
Removal of snow and ice from public highways by private entities.

Upon request by a person, the Commissioner of Highways may authorize such person to hire private persons, firms, contractors, or entities to remove snow and ice from any public highway in Planning District 8, provided that there will be no costs to the Commonwealth or its political subdivisions for work pursuant to this section. No private person, firm, contractor, or entity employed to remove snow and ice from any public highway shall be afforded sovereign immunity or immunity in any form whatsoever. Private persons, firms, contractors, or entities so employed shall be liable for civil damages, including damages for death, injury, or property damage resulting from any act or omission relating to the removal of snow and ice from public highways. Nothing contained in this section shall limit the authority of the Commissioner of Highways granted under other provisions of law to authorize or contract for the removal of snow and ice from public highways.

History.

1996, c. 714, § 33.1-200.2; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-245.
Comprehensive highway access management standards.

For purposes of this section, “comprehensive highway access management standards” means a coordinated set of state standards and guidelines that allow the Commonwealth and its localities to manage access to the systems of state highways according to their federal functional classification or operational characteristics through the control of and improvements to the location, number, spacing, and design of entrances, median openings, turn lanes, street intersections, traffic signals, and interchanges.

The General Assembly declares it to be in the public interest that comprehensive highway access management standards be developed and implemented to enhance the operation and safety of the systems of state highways in order to protect the public health, safety, and general welfare while ensuring that private property is entitled to reasonable access to the systems of state highways. The goals of the comprehensive highway access management standards are:

To reduce traffic congestion and impacts to the level of service of highways, leading to reduced fuel consumption and air pollution;

To enhance public safety by decreasing traffic crash rates;

To support economic development in the Commonwealth by promoting the efficient movement of people and goods;

To reduce the need for new highways and road widening by improving the performance of the existing systems of state highways; and

To preserve public investment in new highways by maximizing their performance.

The Commissioner of Highways shall develop and implement comprehensive highway access management standards for managing access to and preserving and improving the efficient operation of the systems of state highways. The comprehensive highway access management standards shall include standards and guidelines for the location, number, spacing, and design of entrances, median openings, turn lanes, street intersections, traffic signals, and interchanges.Nothing in such standards shall preempt the authority of a local government to regulate the type or density of land uses abutting the systems of state highways.The Commissioner of Highways shall require that any official who approves any highway access project shall certify that he has applied due diligence in approving such project and that such approval is, in his professional opinion, consistent with the minimum standards developed pursuant to this section. An appeal of the denial, revocation, or conditions of a permit shall be in accordance with the provisions of 24 VAC 30-73-50.

History.

2007, cc. 863, 928, § 33.1-198.1; 2014, c. 805; 2019, c. 157.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 157 added the third paragraph of subsection C.